Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2598.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-937, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-937. Failure to file; penalties; notice; suspension A. If a committee fails to timely file a complete report as prescribed by articles 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 1.6 of this chapter, the filing officer shall send a written notice by e-mail email to the committee within five days after the filing deadline that identifies the late report, describes how fines accrue and identifies methods of payment. B. A committee that fails to timely file a report shall pay the filing officer a penalty of ten dollars $20 for each day that the filing is late during the first fifteen days after the filing deadline and twenty-five dollars $50 for each subsequent day that the filing is late.  Penalties accrue until the late report is filed. C. If a committee fails to file a complete report within thirty days after the filing deadline and after providing notice pursuant to subsection A of this section, the filing officer may notify the appropriate enforcement officer prescribed in this article. D. For any political action committee or political party that fails to file three consecutive complete reports, the filing officer shall send by e-mail email to the committee a notice of temporary suspension and the following apply: 1. On receipt, the committee's authority to operate in the jurisdiction is temporarily suspended. 2. The notice shall state that failure to comply with all filing and payment requirements within thirty days after the date of the notice shall result in permanent suspension of the committee's authority to operate in that jurisdiction. E. After compliance with subsection D of this section, the filing officer may permanently suspend the committee and shall notify the committee by e-mail email and is not required to provide any further notice. Permanent or temporary suspension does not eliminate a committee's continuing obligation to file reports and pay any outstanding and accruing penalties provided by law. END_STATUTE